Wyoming, session 2025, HB0106.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) There is created the monument to America
development and oversight task force to consist of the
governor or the governor's designee, the tribal liaisons
appointed by the governor under W.S. 9-1-221, the speaker
of the house of representatives, the president of the
HB0106

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0194
senate and any living former governor, former speaker of
the house of representatives or former president of the
senate who agrees to participate in the task force.

(b) The task force shall:

(i) Develop preliminary specifications, plans
and features for the monument to America in recognition of
the upcoming two hundred and fifty (250) year anniversary
of the signing of the Declaration of Independence. The
monument to America shall be similar in size and scope to
the Mount Rushmore national monument and shall feature
important historical American figures as recommended by the
task force including native American leaders. The
historical figures proposed for the monument shall include
important historical figures from the eighteenth,
nineteenth and twentieth centuries;

(ii) Determine a location for the monument to
America, with the objective of locating the monument on
school trust lands for the long‑term benefit of the common
school account within the permanent land fund;

HB0106

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0194
(iii) Make recommendations for the development,
location and administrative structure of the monument to
America to the governor, the joint appropriations committee
and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural
resources interim committee not later than July 4, 2026.

(c) The active legislative members of the task force
shall receive compensation, per diem and travel expenses in
the manner and amount prescribed by W.S. 28-5-101. Task
force members who are not active legislators and are not
state employees shall receive the compensation, per diem
and mileage paid to members of the Wyoming legislature
under W.S. 28-5-101.

(d) The task force shall be staffed by the department
of state parks and cultural resources. The department of
tourism and the state geologist shall provide assistance to
the task force at the request of the task force.

(e) The task force shall terminate June 30, 2027.

Section 2.

HB0106

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0194
(a) There is appropriated forty thousand dollars
($40,000.00) from the general fund to the governor's office
to pay compensation, mileage and per diem for
nonlegislative members of the task force. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2027. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2027.

(b) There is appropriated forty thousand dollars
($40,000.00) from the general fund to the legislative
service office to pay for salary, mileage and per diem of
active legislative members appointed to the task force.
This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with
the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2027.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2027.

HB0106

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0194
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0106